Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 1

Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act

26-6-101. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act.”

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 7; T.C.A., § 26-807; Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5 provided that the act applies to all actions commenced on or after July 1, 2019, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “part” for “chapter”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Enforceability of authenticated foreign order for assignment of income for support, § 36-5-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-8-14, 1-9.05-2.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 2; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 103.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-102. Construction for uniformity.

This part shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 6; T.C.A., § 26-806; Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5 provided that the act applies to all actions commenced on or after July 1, 2019, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “part” for “chapter”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5. July 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-103. “Foreign judgment” defined.

As used in this part, “foreign judgment” means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of the United States or of any other court which is entitled to full faith and credit in this state.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 1; T.C.A., § 26-801; Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5 provided that the act applies to all actions commenced on or after July 1, 2019, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “part” for “chapter”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5. July 1, 2019.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 7.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-104. Effect and treatment of authenticated foreign judgment — Foreign defamation judgment.

A copy of any foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with the acts of congress or the statutes of this state may be filed in the office of the clerk of any circuit or chancery court of this state.

The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a judgment of a court of record of this state.

A judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject to the same procedures, defenses and proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a judgment of a court of record of this state and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.

For the purpose of rendering declaratory relief with respect to a person's liability for a foreign defamation judgment and determining whether the foreign defamation judgment should be deemed nonrecognizable under § 26-6-108, this state's courts have personal jurisdiction over any person who obtains a foreign defamation judgment against any person who:

Is a resident of this state;

Is a person or entity amenable to the jurisdiction of this state;

Has assets in this state; or

May have to take action in this state to comply with the foreign defamation judgment.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 2; T.C.A., § 26-802; Acts 2010, ch. 900, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 900, § 3 provided that the act, which added § 26-6-104(d) and enacted § 26-6-108, shall apply to foreign judgments filed for enforcement on or after July 1, 2010.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 2, 4; 9 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 101.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-105. Service of process — Enforcement proceeding delayed.

At the time of the filing of the foreign judgment, the judgment creditor or the judgment creditor's lawyer shall make and file with the clerk of the court an affidavit setting forth the name and last known post office address of the judgment debtor, and the judgment creditor.

Promptly upon the filing of the foreign judgment and affidavit, the clerk of the court wherein the judgment is filed shall issue a summons to be delivered for service to any person authorized to serve process. This person shall serve the summons and return endorsed thereon shall be proof of the time and manner of service.

No execution or other process for enforcement of a foreign judgment filed hereunder shall issue until thirty (30) days after the date a summons has been served upon the judgment debtor.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 3; 1977, ch. 50, § 1; T.C.A., § 26-803.

26-6-106. Appeal or stay of judgment.

If the judgment debtor shows the court of this state that an appeal from the foreign judgment is pending or will be taken, or that a stay of execution has been granted, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or the stay of execution expires or is vacated.

If the judgment debtor shows the court of this state any ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of any court of this state would be stayed, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment for an appropriate period.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 4; Acts 1978, ch. 550, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 26-804.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-107. Creditor's right to bring enforcement action.

The right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce the creditor's judgment instead of proceeding under this part remains unimpaired.

Acts 1976, ch. 530, § 5; T.C.A., § 26-805; Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5 provided that the act applies to all actions commenced on or after July 1, 2019, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “part” for “chapter”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5. July 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IX. Miscellaneous (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 405.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

26-6-108. Foreign defamation judgments.

For the purposes of this section only, a “foreign defamation judgment” shall mean any judgment for a cause of action equivalent or fundamentally similar to an action for libel or slander that is rendered by a court or tribunal outside the United States or its territories or possessions. This section shall not apply to any judgment for defamation, slander or libel rendered by a federal court or a court or tribunal in this or any other state of the United States, its territories or possessions.

In addition to any other defenses that may exist, no foreign defamation judgment shall be authenticated, or execution issued upon, if:

It is determined that the judgment was rendered by a judicial system that does not provide impartial tribunals or procedures substantially compatible with the requirements of due process of law applicable to Tennessee courts;

The court or tribunal issuing the foreign defamation judgment did not have personal jurisdiction over the defendant in accordance with the principles applicable under Tennessee law; or

The court or tribunal issuing the foreign defamation judgment did not have subject matter jurisdiction over the action.

A foreign defamation judgment shall not be authenticated by any court of this state until it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the defamation, libel or slander law applied in the foreign defamation court's jurisdiction provides the same or higher protection for freedom of speech and press as would be provided under both the United States and Tennessee Constitutions. If it is determined that the law in the foreign defamation judgment's jurisdiction provides such same or greater protection, then the court may proceed to consider if the judgment may be authenticated as a foreign judgment. If it is determined that the law in the foreign defamation judgment's jurisdiction does not provide such same or greater protection, or if no finding is made on this point, then the court may not authenticate that foreign defamation judgment and the same shall be void until such time as the court may make or reverse its findings.

Acts 2010, ch. 900, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 900, § 3 provided that the act, which added § 26-6-104(d) and enacted § 26-6-108, shall apply to foreign judgments filed for enforcement on or after July 1, 2010.

26-6-109. Applicability of part.

This part does not apply to judgments covered by the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, compiled in part 2 of this chapter.

Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5 provided that the act applies to all actions commenced on or after July 1, 2019, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 278, § 5. July 1, 2019.